Massachusetts, session 194th, H3284.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 7 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by section 10 of chapter 238 of
the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 4T the following section:-
Section 4U. The human resources division shall establish a program for agency heads and
department heads as defined in section 1 of chapter 29 that shall identify, recruit, hire, develop,
promote and retain military veterans and alumni of: (i) the Peace Corps of the United States; (ii)
AmeriCorps; and (iii) commonwealth student corps established under chapter 192 of the acts of
2007 in non-civil service public hiring practices. The human resources division shall provide
agency heads or department heads with a certificate confirming a person is a military veterans or
an alumnus of the Peace Corps of the United States, AmeriCorps and commonwealth student
corps.
of 1